Vermont, session 2025-2026, S113.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. BELLOWS FALLS PROJECT HYDROELECTRIC DAM; AGENCY
OF TRANSPORTATION; FEDERAL RELICENSING; REQUEST
FOR CONDITIONS
(a) The Agency of Transportation shall, as soon as practicable, submit
comments, recommendations, and proposed terms and conditions to the
VT LEG #380659 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.113
2025 Page 2 of 3
Federal Energy Regulatory Commission regarding the relicensing of Project
No. 1855-050, the Bellows Falls Hydroelectric Project (the Project).
(b) The Agency shall specifically request that the license for the Project
include terms and conditions that would require the owner or operator of the
Project to develop a plan for, and contribute to, the cost of repairs,
maintenance, and, if necessary, replacement of publicly owned bridges that
cross the power canal that supplies water to the Project.
(c) The Agency’s filing shall include evidence and facts supporting the
inclusion of the terms and conditions described in subsection (b) of this
section, including that:
(1) the power canal currently serves no purpose other than providing
water necessary for the operation of the Project, which could not produce
electricity without the water supplied by the power canal;
(2) the power canal creates a physical barrier that separates the island
from the rest of the Village of Bellows Falls and the Town of Rockingham;
(3) the bridges across the canal are necessary to the physical and
socioeconomic activity on the island in the Village of Bellows Falls, including
access to:
(A) the Connecticut River and cultural sites, including a petroglyph
site, lithic site, and Native American burial site; and
VT LEG #380659 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.113
2025 Page 3 of 3
(B) rail and transit facilities that serve the Village of Bellows Falls,
Town of Rockingham, and surrounding communities;
(4) economic redevelopment efforts are planned for the island, including
mixed-use developments and the reconnection of Bellows Falls, Vermont, to
Walpole, New Hampshire, via the Vilas Bridge; and
(5) the bridges are critical to ensuring adequate regular and emergency
access to businesses, structures, landmarks, and activities on the island, as well
as future residents of the island.
(d) The Agency of Transportation shall provide a copy of all materials that
it submits to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission to the House and
Senate Committees on Transportation.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380659 v.3